Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Subarticle D. Optical Mark Reading Equipment.

§ 23-15-501.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 195, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§23-15-501. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-501 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 1; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 157, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-503.
Definitions.

As used in this subarticle, unless otherwise specified:

“Optimal mark reading (OMR)” means a method of capturing data electronically into a computer system.

“Optical mark reading equipment (OMR)” means an apparatus that reads pen and pencil marks made in pre-defined positions on paper ballots to automatically examine and count votes.

“Counting center” means one or more locations used for the automatic counting of ballots.

“Marking device” means a pen or pencil that the voters use to record their paper ballots, which is readable by the OMR equipment.

“Ballot” means a paper ballot on which votes are recorded by means of marking the ballot with a marking device.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-503 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 2; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 158; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 87, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-505.
Authority to purchase or rent OMR equipment; applicable law.

The board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to purchase or rent OMR equipment that meets the requirements of Section 23-15-507 and may use such system in all or a part of the precincts within its boundaries. The provisions of this chapter shall be controlling with respect to elections in which OMR equipment is used, and shall be liberally construed so as to carry out the purpose of this chapter. The provisions of the election law relating to the conduct of elections with paper ballots, insofar as they are applicable, shall apply.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-505 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 3; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 159; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 88, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-507.
Construction of OMR equipment.

No OMR equipment shall be acquired or used in accordance with this chapter unless it shall:

Permit eligible voters to vote at any election for all persons for whom they are lawfully entitled to vote; to vote for as many persons for an office as they are lawfully entitled to vote; to vote for or against any ballot initiative, measure or other local issue upon which they are lawfully entitled to vote;

The OMR equipment shall be capable of rejecting choices marked on the ballot if the number of choices exceeds the number that the voter is entitled to vote for the office or on the measure;

Permit each voter, in presidential elections, by one (1) mark to vote for the candidates of that party for President, Vice President, and their presidential electors, or to vote individually for the electors of their choice when permitted by law;

Permit each voter, in other than primary elections, to vote for the nominees of one or more parties and for independent candidates;

Permit each voter to vote for candidates only in the primary in which he or she is qualified to vote;

Permit each voter to vote for persons whose names are not on the printed ballot;

Be suitably designed for the purpose used, of durable construction, and may be used safely, efficiently and accurately in the conduct of elections and the counting of ballots;

Be provided with means for sealing the ballots after the close of the polls;

When properly operated, record correctly and count accurately all votes cast; and

Provide the voter with a set of instructions that will be displayed in such a way that a voter may readily learn the method of voting.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-507 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 4; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 160; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 89, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-509.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 2017, ch. 441, § 196, effective from and after July 1, 2017.

§23-15-509. [Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-509 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 5; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 161, eff from and after January 1, 1987.]

§ 23-15-511.
Form of ballots; posting of sample ballots; ballot security envelopes.

The ballots shall, as far as practicable, be in the same order of arrangement as provided for paper ballots that are to be counted manually, except that the information may be printed in vertical or horizontal rows. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as prohibiting the information being presented to the voters from being printed on both sides of a single ballot. In those years when a special election shall occur on the same day as the general election, the names of candidates in any special election and the general election shall be placed on the same ballot by the election commissioners or officials in charge of the election, but the general election candidates shall be clearly distinguished from the special election candidates. At any time a special election is held on the same day as a party primary election, the names of the candidates in the special election may be placed on the same ballot by the officials in charge of the election, but shall be clearly distinguished as special election candidates or primary election candidates.

Ballots shall be printed in plain clear type in black ink and upon clear white materials of such size and arrangement as to be compatible with the OMR equipment. Absentee ballots shall be prepared and printed in the same form and shall be on the same size and texture as the regular official ballots, except that they shall be printed on tinted paper; or the ink used to print the ballots shall be of a color different from that of the ink used to print the regular official ballots. Arrows may be printed on the ballot to indicate the place to mark the ballot, which may be to the right or left of the names of candidates and propositions. The titles of offices may be arranged in vertical columns on the ballot and shall be printed above or at the side of the names of candidates so as to indicate clearly the candidates for each office and the number to be elected. In case there are more candidates for an office than can be printed in one (1) column, the ballot shall be clearly marked that the list of candidates is continued on the following column. The names of candidates for each office shall be printed in vertical columns, grouped by the offices that they seek. In partisan elections, the party designation of each candidate, which may be abbreviated, shall be printed following his or her name.

One (1) sample ballot, which shall be a facsimile of the official ballot and instructions to the voters, shall be provided for each precinct and shall be posted in each polling place on election day.

A separate ballot security envelope or suitable equivalent in which the voter can place his or her ballot after voting, shall be provided to conceal the choices the voter has made. Absentee voters will receive a similar ballot security envelope provided by the county in which the absentee voter will insert their voted ballot, which then can be inserted into a return envelope to be mailed back to the election official. Absentee ballots will not be required to be folded when a ballot security envelope is provided.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-511 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 6; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 162; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 90, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-513.
Preparation and delivery of necessary forms and supplies; minimum number of ballots to be printed.

The official ballots, sample ballots and other necessary forms and supplies of the forms and description required by this chapter or required for the conduct of elections with an electronic voting system shall be prepared and furnished by the same official, in the same manner and time, and delivered to the same officials as provided by law with respect to paper ballots that are to be counted manually.

For each primary election, the number of official ballots that shall be printed by each executive committee shall be not less than one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the highest number of votes cast in a comparable primary election conducted by the same political party in the preceding ten (10) years.

For each general election, the number of official ballots that shall be printed shall be a number equal to not less than sixty percent (60%) of the registered voters eligible to vote in the election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-513 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 7; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 163; Laws, 2011, ch. 357, § 2; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 91, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-515.
Storage, maintenance, repair and preparation of equipment.

The circuit clerk shall be the custodian of OMR equipment acquired by the county, who shall be charged with the proper storage, maintenance and repair of the OMR equipment. The municipal clerk shall be the custodian of the OMR equipment acquired by the municipality, and shall be charged with the proper storage, maintenance and repair of the OMR equipment. The custodian or the officials in charge of the election shall repair or replace any OMR equipment which fails to function properly on election day.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-515 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 8; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 164; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 92, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-517.
Opening and closing polls; instructing voters; spoiled ballots.

At least one (1) hour before the opening of the polls, the officials in charge of the election shall arrive at the polling place and set up the voting booths so that they will be in clear view of the poll managers; the poll managers shall examine the ballots to verify that they have the correct ballots for their precinct and check the supplies, records and forms, and post the sample ballots and instructions to the voters. They shall also inspect the ballot boxes to ensure they contain only voted absentee ballots in their envelopes with the required applications, and then seal the box for voting.

Each voter shall receive written and/or verbal instructions by the poll managers instructing the voter how to properly vote the paper ballot before the voter enters the voting booth. If any voter needs additional instructions after entering the voting booth, two (2) poll managers may, if necessary, enter the booth and give him or her such additional instructions. If any voter spoils a ballot the voter may obtain others, one (1) at a time, not exceeding three (3) in all, upon returning each spoiled ballot. The word “SPOILED” shall be written across the face of the ballot and it shall be deposited into the sealed ballot box. When the polls close once the last ballot has been cast or at 7:00 p.m., whichever is later, the poll managers shall break the seal on the ballot box to process the absentee ballots. Ballots marked as spoiled shall be bundled together and placed in an envelope designated for spoiled ballots. Once the polls have officially closed, the envelope that contains the spoiled ballots and the unused ballots shall be placed in the ballot box or other container provided for that purpose which shall be sealed and returned to the officials in charge of the election.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-517 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 9; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 165; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 93, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-519.
Ballot accounting report; tamper-evident seals for ballot boxes; seal log; delivery of ballot box; return of records and supplies.

The poll managers shall prepare a ballot accounting report that documents the number of voters who have voted, as indicated by the receipt book and the number of ballots used in the election. The poll managers shall place the report in the ballot box, with the seal logs, receipt books, absentee ballots, affidavit ballots, challenged ballots, curbside ballots, emergency ballots, spoiled ballots and unused ballots, which thereupon shall be sealed with a tamper-evident seal, which is a seal that has been designed in such a way to allow someone to easily detect any tampering, so that no additional ballots may be deposited or removed from the ballot box. The poll managers, while they have possession of the election materials, and the officials in charge of the election, once the poll managers have delivered the ballot box to the counting center or other designated place, shall be required to keep a seal log to document each time a tamper-evident seal for a ballot box is opened or changed. The seal log shall require the name of the person who opened the seal, the old seal number, the new seal number, the date the seal was opened and the purpose for opening the seal. The receiving and returning poll manager shall deliver the ballot box to the counting center or other designated place and receive a signed, numbered receipt therefor. The poll books and other records and supplies shall be returned as directed by the officials in charge of the election. Failure to strictly comply with the provisions of this section shall not result in a presumption of fraud.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-519 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 10; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 166; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 94, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-521.
Testing of OMR equipment.

Before counting the ballots, the election commissioners, or their designees, shall have the OMR equipment tested to ascertain that it will accurately count the votes cast for all offices and on all measures. Representatives of the political parties, candidates, the press and the general public may witness the test conducted on the OMR equipment. The test shall be conducted by processing a preaudited group of ballots so marked as to record a predetermined number of valid votes for each candidate and on each measure, and shall include for each office one or more ballots that have votes in excess of the number allowed by law in order to test the ability of the OMR equipment to reject such votes. If any error is detected, the cause of the error shall be ascertained and corrected and an errorless count shall be made and certified to by the officials in charge before the count is started. On completion of the count, the programs, test materials and ballots shall be sealed and retained as provided for paper ballots.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-521 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 11; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 167; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 95, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-523.
Counting vote.

All proceedings at the counting center shall be under the direction of the election commissioners or officials in charge of the election, and shall be conducted under the observations of the public, but no persons except those authorized for the purpose shall touch any ballot. All persons who are engaged in processing and counting of the ballots shall take the oath provided in Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890.

The election commissioners or the officials in charge of the election shall appoint qualified electors who have received the training required by subsection (11) of this section to serve as members of the “resolution board.” An odd number of not less than three (3) members shall be appointed to the resolution board. The members of the board shall take the oath provided in Section 268, Mississippi Constitution of 1890. All ballots that have been rejected by the OMR equipment and that are damaged or defective, blank or overvoted will be reviewed by the board. Election commissioners, candidates who are on the ballot and the spouse, parents, siblings or children of such a candidate shall not be appointed to the resolution board. In general and special elections, members of the party executive committees shall not be appointed to the resolution board unless members of all of the party executive committees who have a candidate on the ballot are appointed to the resolution board.

If any ballot is damaged or defective so that it cannot be properly counted by the OMR equipment, the ballot will be deposited in an envelope provided for that purpose marked “RESOLUTION BOARD.” All such ballots shall be carefully handled so as to avoid altering, removing or adding any mark on the ballot.

The election commissioners or the officials in charge of the election shall have the members of the resolution board ascertain the intent of the voter, if possible, and, if so, manually count any damaged or defective ballots.

The resolution board shall prepare a duplicate to the damaged or defective ballot in the following manner:

The resolution board shall prepare a duplicate to the original damaged or defective ballot marked identically to the original.

The resolution board shall mark the first original they examine as “Original #1” and the duplicate of this original as “Duplicate #1.” Later originals and duplicates shall be likewise marked and numbered consecutively so the duplicate of each original can be identified. Duplicate ballots shall be stamped in a different manner from the original ballots so that they may be easily distinguished from the originals.

The duplicate ballots prepared pursuant to this paragraph shall be counted by the OMR equipment.

The resolution board shall examine ballots that have been rejected by the OMR equipment for appearing to be “blank” to verify if they are blank or were marked with a “nondetectable” marking device. If it is determined that the ballot was marked with a nondetectable device, the resolution board shall prepare a duplicate to the original blank ballot in the same manner and in accordance with the same process provided in subsection (3)(c).

All ballots that are rejected by the OMR equipment and that contain overvotes shall be inspected by the resolution board. Regarding those rejected ballots upon which an overvote appears, if the voter intent cannot be determined by the resolution board, the officials in charge of the election may use the OMR equipment in determining the vote in the races that are unaffected by the overvote. All other ballots that are overvoted shall be counted manually following the provisions of this section at the direction of the officials in charge of the election. The return printed by the OMR equipment to which have been added the manually tallied ballots, which shall be duly certified by the officials in charge of the election, shall constitute the official return of each voting precinct. Unofficial and incomplete returns may be released during the count. Upon the completion of the counting, the official returns shall be open to the public.

When the resolution board reviews any OMR ballot in which the voter has failed to fill in the arrow, oval, circle or square for a candidate or a ballot measure, the resolution board shall, if the intent of the voter can be ascertained, count the vote if:

The voter marks the ballot with a “cross” (X) or “checkmark” (Π) and the lines that form the mark intersect within or on the line of the arrow, oval, circle or square by the ballot measure or the name of the candidate.

The voter blackens the arrow, oval, circle or square adjacent to the ballot measure or the name of the candidate in pencil or ink and the blackened portion extends beyond the boundaries of the arrow, oval, circle or square.

The voter marks the ballot with a “cross” (X) or “checkmark” (Π) and the lines that form the mark intersect adjacent to the ballot measure or the name of the candidate.

The voter underlines the ballot measure or the name of a candidate.

The voter draws a line from the arrow, oval, circle or square to a ballot measure or the name of a candidate.

The voter draws a circle or oval around the ballot measure or the name of the candidate.

The voter draws a circle or oval around the arrow, oval, circle or square adjacent to the ballot measure or the name of the candidate.

The resolution board, when inspecting an OMR ballot that contains or appears to contain one or more overvotes, appears to be damaged or defective, or is rejected by the OMR equipment for any reason or cannot be counted by the OMR equipment, shall make its determination in accordance with the following:

When an elector casts more votes for any office or measure than he or she is entitled to cast at an election, all the elector’s votes for that office or measure are invalid and the elector is deemed to have voted for none of them. If an elector casts less votes for any office or measure than he or she is entitled to cast at an election, all votes cast by the elector shall be counted but no vote shall be counted more than once.

If an elector casts more than one (1) vote for the same candidate for the same office, the first vote is valid and the remaining votes for that candidate are invalid.

No write-in vote for a candidate whose name is printed on the ballot shall be regarded as invalid due to misspelling a candidate’s name, or by abbreviation, addition or omission or use of a wrong initial in the name, as long as the intent of the voter can be ascertained.

In any case where a voter writes in the name of a candidate for President of the United States whose name is printed on the general election ballot, the failure by the voter to write in the name of a candidate for the Office of Vice President of the United States on the general election ballot does not invalidate the elector’s vote for the slate of electors for any candidate whose name is written in for the Office of President of the United States.

For any ballot measure in which the words “for” or “against” are printed on a ballot, if the voter shall write the word “for” or the word “against” instead of or in addition to marking the ballot in accordance with the ballot instruction in the space adjacent to the preprinted words “for” or “against,” the resolution board shall, in reviewing such ballot, count the vote in accordance with the voter’s handwritten preference, unless the voter marks the ballot in the space adjacent to the preprinted words “for” or “against” contrary to the handwritten preference, in which case no vote shall be recorded for such ballot in regard to the ballot measure.

For any ballot measure in which the words “yes” or “no” are printed on a ballot, if the voter shall write the word “yes” or the word “no” instead of or in addition to marking the ballot in accordance with the ballot instructions in the space adjacent to the preprinted words “yes” or “no,” the resolution board shall, in reviewing such ballot, count the vote in accordance with the voter’s handwritten preference, unless the voter marks the ballot in the space adjacent to the preprinted words “yes” or “no” contrary to the handwritten preference, in which case no vote shall be recorded for such ballot in regard to the ballot measure.

OMR equipment shall be programmed, calibrated, adjusted and set up to reject ballots that appear to be damaged or defective. Any switch, lever or feature on OMR equipment that enables or permits the OMR equipment to override the rejection of damaged or defective ballots so that such ballots will not be reviewed by the resolution board, shall not be used.

Ballots shall be manually counted by the resolution board only when the ballots are:

Properly before the resolution board due to being rejected by the OMR equipment because the ballots appear to be damaged or defective or are rejected by the OMR equipment for any other reason; or

Properly before the resolution board due to a malfunction in the OMR equipment.

The resolution board shall make and keep a record regarding the handling and counting of all ballots inspected under this section.

The executive committee of each county or municipality, in the case of a primary election, or the election commissioners of each county or municipality, in the case of all other elections, in conjunction with the circuit or municipal clerk respectively, shall sponsor and conduct, a training session for up to two (2) hours, not less than five (5) days before each election, to instruct those qualified electors who are appointed to serve as members of the resolution board as to their specific duties in the election. No member appointed to serve on the resolution board shall serve in any election unless he or she has received such instruction once during the twelve (12) months immediately preceding the date upon which the election is held. Online training courses developed by the Secretary of State, though not sponsored or conducted by the executive committee or the election commissioners, may be used to meet the requirements of this subsection (11).

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-523 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 12; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 168; Laws, 2002, ch. 529, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 528, § 7; Laws, 2009, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 96, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 23-15-525.
Authority of Secretary of State and election commissioners for the safe and efficient use of OMR equipment; resolution board for rejected ballots.

The Secretary of State shall have the power to issue supplementary instructions and procedures for the safe and efficient use of OMR equipment within the State of Mississippi and to carry out the purpose of the chapter. Subject to such instructions and procedures provided by the Secretary of State and the provisions of this chapter, the election commissioners shall have the power to make additional provisions for the conduct of elections with the OMR equipment.

If for any reason the OMR equipment shall become inoperable, the poll managers shall direct voters to operating OMR equipment or to cast emergency paper ballots. The paper ballots shall be administered in accordance with the laws concerning paper ballots.

HISTORY:
Derived from 1972 Code §23-7-525 [Laws, 1984, ch. 509, § 13; repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 340]; en, Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 169; Laws, 2017, ch. 441, § 97, eff from and after July 1, 2017.